Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7181.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 6-13 of the General Laws entitled "Unfair Sales Practices" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-13-22. Termination of automatic deductions – Notice of rate increases or substantial
changes in services.
(a) Any health club, as defined in § 5-50-1, which automatically deducts from a checking
or savings account, or a credit or debit card, or similar device, on a regular schedule, monthly or
otherwise, for a consumer to access the health club, shall stop making such deduction within thirty
(30) calendar days of the consumer giving the health club notice that the consumer wants the
automatic deduction to be stopped. Notice by the consumer shall be provided in written form only
and delivered by mail or in person.
(b) Any health club who intends to provide a rate increase in charges or a substantial change
in the nature of the health club, or services being provided to the consumer, shall give the consumer
notice of the proposed rate increase or change in services by a writing executed and delivered to
the consumer at least sixty (60) calendar days prior to the date when the rate increase or change in
services are to take effect.
(c) A health club may be fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a violation of this
section. In addition, any consumer against whom the health club violates the provisions of this
section shall be entitled to terminate their contractual agreement with the health club as of the date

of the violation, and shall not be responsible to the health club for any charges assessed by the
health club on or after the date of the violation.
(d) If any of the provisions of this section violate an express provision of a contract between
a consumer and a health club, then the provisions of this section shall apply to the next renewal of
that contract which occurs after the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003926
========
LC003926 - Page 2 of 3